Maryland, session 2025, HB0404.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–758.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0404*

HOUSE BILL 404
(2) “COUNTY BOARD” MEANS THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY
BOARD OF EDUCATION.
(3) “ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(I) 1. IS THE PARENT OF A SCHOOL STUDENT; OR
2. HAS LEGAL CUSTODY OF A SCHOOL STUDENT AS A
LEGAL GUARDIAN; AND
(II) VOLUNTEERS AT THE SCHOOL IN WHICH THE STUDENT IS
ENROLLED.
(4) “SCHOOL” MEANS A PUBLIC OR NONPUBLIC ELEMENTARY OR
SECONDARY SCHOOL IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY, INCLUDING A CHARTER
SCHOOL.
(B) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS SECTION, EACH ELIGIBLE
TAXPAYER, REGARDLESS OF INDIVIDUAL OR JOINT FILING STATUS, MAY CLAIM A
CREDIT AGAINST THE STATE INCOME TAX IN THE AMOUNT STATED ON A TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE ISSUED TO THE ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) (1) THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION SHALL, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE COMPTROLLER, DEVELOP AND MAKE AVAILABLE AN
APPLICATION AND A TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE TO BE USED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) AN ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER SHALL SUBMIT AN APPLICATION FOR A
CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) IF THE STUDENT IS ENROLLED IN A PUBLIC SCHOOL, TO THE
COUNTY BOARD MEMBER WHO REPRESENTS THE SCHOOL; OR
(II) IF THE STUDENT IS ENROLLED IN A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL, TO
AN ADMINISTRATOR OF THE SCHOOL.
(3) (I) ON APPLICATION BY AN ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A COUNTY BOARD MEMBER OR SCHOOL
ADMINISTRATOR SHALL ISSUE A TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO
$20 FOR EACH HOUR THAT THE ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER VOLUNTEERS AT THE SCHOOL
IN WHICH THE STUDENT IS ENROLLED.

HOUSE BILL 404 3
(II) FOR ANY TAXABLE YEAR:
1. AN ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER MAY APPLY FOR AND
RECEIVE MORE THAN ONE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER
ANOTHER ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER HAS RECEIVED A TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE FOR THE
SAME STUDENT; AND
2. THE AGGREGATE AMOUNT OF THE TAX CREDIT THAT
EACH ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER MAY CLAIM MAY NOT EXCEED $500.
(4) THE COUNTY BOARD MEMBER OR SCHOOL ADMINISTRATOR
ISSUING A TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL KEEP A RECORD
OF THE NUMBER OF VOLUNTEER HOURS ACCRUED BY EACH ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER
THAT RECEIVES A TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE.
(D) IF THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION IN ANY TAXABLE YEAR
EXCEEDS THE STATE INCOME TAX FOR THAT TAXABLE YEAR, THE ELIGIBLE
TAXPAYER MAY CLAIM A REFUND IN THE AMOUNT OF THE EXCESS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.